Louisiana, session 2026, SB240.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:24.8(A)(2) and (B), 407.33(5) and (7), 407.34, 407.35(A),
407.36(D), 407.40(A)(7) and (B)(1)(b) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
17:407.36(E), 407.42(A)(3), 407.51(A)(13), and 407.101(C)(1)(qq) and (rr) are hereby
enacted to read as follows:
§24.8. Prekindergarten programs
Page 1 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-182 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 240
A. * * *
(2) All public prekindergarten programs shall comply with the child safety
and welfare minimum standards provided for in R.S. 17:407.41.
B.(1) The governing authority of any approved nonpublic elementary school
may develop and offer prekindergarten instruction. The youngest age at which a
child may enter prekindergarten provided for by this Subsection shall be three years
old by September thirtieth of the year in which the child enrolls in prekindergarten.
(2)B. All nonpublic prekindergarten programs shall be licensed as an early
learning center pursuant to Part X-B of this Chapter and shall comply with the
child safety and welfare minimum standards provided for in R.S. 17:407.41.
* * *
§407.33. Definitions
As used in this Part, the following terms have the following meanings unless
the context clearly indicates otherwise:
* * *
(5) "Early learning center" means any child day care center, Early Head Start
Center, Head Start Center, or nonpublic prekindergarten program.
* * *
(7) "License type" means the type of license applied for or held, which shall
include Type I, Type II, and Type III, and Type IV.
* * *
§407.34. Requirement of licensure
All early learning centers shall be licensed prior to beginning operations in
Louisiana. Early learning center licenses shall be of three four types: Type I, Type
II, and Type III, and Type IV.
§407.35. Exemptions from licensure requirements
A. The provisions of this Part shall not apply to grades kindergarten and
above, prekindergarten programs attached to a public day school, Louisiana
Montessori accredited or provisionally accredited approved schools, camps,
Page 2 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-182 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 240
registered family child day care homes, and care given without charge. However, all
prekindergarten programs shall comply with the child safety and welfare minimum
standards provided for in R.S. 17:407.41.
* * *
§407.36. Types of Licenses
* * *
D. A "Type IV license" is the type of license issued to any early learning
center which is attached to a school.
D.E. Nothing in this Section shall prevent an early learning center otherwise
qualified for a Type I license to voluntarily seek a Type II or Type III license, or an
early learning center otherwise qualified for a Type II license to voluntarily seek a
Type III license, provided that such early learning center meets the standards set
forth for such license.
* * *
§407.40. Rules, regulations and standards for licenses
A. The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education shall promulgate
regulations for each type of license which, at a minimum, shall accomplish all of the
following:
* * *
(7) Include requirements for employees of early learning centers to receive
training in recognition and prevention of shaken baby syndrome. The Louisiana
Department of Health, office of public health, shall provide information and
resources to the state Department of Education for such training and for other areas
of training required for employees of early learning centers in promoting the health,
safety, and welfare of children. The state Department of Education shall post such
information and resources on its website so that it is easily accessible by employees
of early learning centers. The requirement provided for in this Paragraph shall
not apply to a Type IV early learning center.
B.(1) Every early learning center approved for licensure by the department
Page 3 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-182 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 240
shall be required to have all of the following:
* * *
(b) Approval from the Louisiana Department of Health. A Type IV early
learning center shall be inspected by the Louisiana Department of Health
pursuant to the rules and regulations applicable to schools.
* * *
§407.42. Review of criminal history information and state central registry of child
abuse and neglect
A. * * *
(3) The provisions of Subsection B of this Section shall not apply to a
Type IV early learning center employee who has complied with the criminal
history background check and state central registry check provisions provided
for in R.S. 17:15.
* * *
§407.51. Advisory Council
A. The board shall establish an Advisory Council on Early Childhood Care
and Education that shall consist of the following members:
* * *
(13) A representative of Type IV early learning centers, selected by the
state superintendent of education.
* * *
§407.101. Early Childhood Care and Education Commission
* * *
C.(1) The commission is composed of forty-five forty-seven members as
follows:
* * *
(qq) One representative of Type IV early learning centers, appointed by
the president of the Senate.
(rr) One representative of Type IV early learning centers, appointed by
Page 4 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-182 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 240
the speaker of the House of Representatives.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.